Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1659.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 327(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 327. Junior hunter projects.(a) General rule.--It shall be the duty of the commission to initiate, implement and administer two or more junior license hunter projects and a mentored hunter season for the purpose of increasing and sustaining interest in hunting among young persons and mentored adults of this Commonwealth. Except for the requirement to actually hold a junior hunting license under section 2705(2) or (9) (relating to classes of licenses) or a license under section 2701(c) (relating to license requirements) and as may otherwise be modified by commission regulations, all 12345678910111213141516171819 participants in any junior hunter project or mentored hunter season shall comply with all of the provisions of this title and the regulations promulgated hereunder.* * *(c) Mentoring season.--(1) The commission shall establish a seven-day mentoring season immediately following the conclusion of the regular firearms deer season.(2) During the mentoring season, an individual holding a license issued under section 2701(c) or 2705(2) or (9) may hunt deer and small game species as designated by the commission, provided the individual is accompanied by a mentor.Section 2. Section 2102 of Title 34 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2102. Regulations.* * *(b.1) Regular antlered deer hunting season.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the regular antlered deer hunting season shall open on:(1) The first Monday following Thanksgiving in districts 1, 3, 5 and 7 as identified in section 301(b) (relating to organization of commission).(2) The first Saturday before Thanksgiving in districts 2, 4, 6, 8 and 9 as identified in section 301(b).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1659PN2017 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627